Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201169-2711
Conflict of
laws; how treated.

If a court of competent jurisdiction
finds that the provisions of sections 69-2704 to 69-2711 and
of sections 69-2702 and 69-2703 conflict and cannot be harmonized, then the
provisions of sections 69-2702 and 69-2703 shall control. If sections 69-2704
to 69-2711 or any part of any
such sections causes sections 69-2702 and 69-2703 to no longer constitute
a Qualifying or Model Statute, as those terms are defined in the Master Settlement
Agreement, then that portion of sections 69-2704 to 69-2711 shall
not be valid.

Laws 2003, LB 572, § 13;

Laws 2011, LB590, § 17.